Maryland, session 2026, HB0318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
14–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” means the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission.
15–206.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL ACCEPT AS A REGISTERED VENDOR FOR THE
COMMISSION ANY PERSON THAT IS REGISTERED AS A VENDOR THROUGH A VENDOR
REGISTRATION PROCESS IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY OR PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY ENTER INTO MEMORANDA OF UNDERSTANDING
WITH MONTGOMERY COUNTY AND PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
Article – Public Utilities
16–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” means the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission.
SUBTITLE 4. VENDOR REGISTRATION PROCESS.
20–401.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL ACCEPT AS A REGISTERED VENDOR FOR THE
COMMISSION ANY PERSON THAT IS REGISTERED AS A VENDOR THROUGH A VENDOR

HOUSE BILL 318 3
REGISTRATION PROCESS IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY OR PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY ENTER INTO MEMORANDA OF UNDERSTANDING
WITH MONTGOMERY COUNTY AND PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.